Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 1. General Powers
§ 209a.
Qualified cost mitigation charge orders.

Definitions. As used in this section:

“Electric utility” means any entity engaged in the distribution of electricity directly to the consumers within the State of Vermont.

“Issuer” means any entity approved in a qualified cost mitigation charge order to issue mitigation bonds; “issuer” may include the Vermont qualifying facility contract mitigation authority or the Vermont Public Power Supply Authority.

“Mitigation bond” means a note, bond, debenture, or any other evidence of indebtedness or certificate evidencing an interest in any evidence of indebtedness authorized by a qualified cost mitigation charge order.

“Mitigation charge” means any volumetric charge imposed by the Commission pursuant to a qualified cost mitigation charge order.

“Participating qualifying facility” means any facility described in subdivision 209(a)(8) of this title.

“Power purchase arrangement” means a contract for sale of electricity between a participating qualifying facility with a capacity of 900 kilowatts or greater and a Rule 4.100 purchasing agent, approved by the Public Service Board on or before January 1, 1995.

“Qualified cost mitigation charge order” means an order of the Commission that complies with the requirements of this section.

“Rule 4.100” means Public Utility Commission Rule 4.100 or any amended or successor rule regarding small power production or cogeneration.

“Rule 4.100 purchasing agent” means an entity designated by the Commission to perform the power and financial accounting requirements of Rule 4.100.

“Savings” means the total benefit to electric ratepayers resulting from a qualified cost mitigation charge order, including specifically those benefits resulting from modifications of purchase power arrangements and benefits attributable to the availability of a qualified cost mitigation charge order to pay for those modifications, offset by the costs incurred to obtain the qualified cost mitigation charge order and purchase power arrangement modifications.

General. Upon an application submitted by the Rule 4.100 purchasing agent or other person or entity, and subject to the terms and conditions of this section, the Commission may issue within five years following the effective date of this section one or more qualified cost mitigation charge orders. A qualified cost mitigation charge order shall impose mitigation charges payable to the issuer of mitigation bonds in order to finance the costs associated with mitigating one or more power purchase arrangements.

Qualified cost mitigation charge order provisions. A qualified cost mitigation order shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following:

a finding that a qualified cost mitigation charge order will promote the general good within the State of Vermont;

a uniform mitigation charge imposed for the benefit of the issuer on the consumption of all electricity within the State of Vermont to the extent such electricity is conveyed to consumers by electric utilities, and a requirement that such charge be reflected on ratepayer bills in a manner which clearly reflects both the amount of the charge and the reduction in power costs resulting from the charge;

a specific mechanism for automatic adjustment of the mitigation charge, at least annually, in accordance with electricity consumption forecasts prepared by the Rule 4.100 purchasing agent or other entity approved by the Commission, so that the mitigation charge is imposed at all levels designed to provide revenues sufficient to make timely payments of accrued interest and scheduled principal on all mitigation bonds, as well as ongoing administrative expenses, credit enhancement fees, and scheduled overcollateralization amounts with respect to such mitigation bonds. This automatic adjustment may implement a system in which the mitigation charge is initially paid in full by the electric utilities, and uncollectable amounts plus reasonable carrying costs are reimbursed to the utilities as part of the adjustment;

the covenant and pledge of the State of Vermont set forth in subsection (h) of this section.

Approval by the Commission. The Commission may approve within five years following the effective date of this section a qualified cost mitigation charge order for buydowns or other appropriate modifications, except buyouts, of power purchase arrangements upon finding that such an order will promote the general good within the State of Vermont. To determine that such an order will promote the general good, the Commission shall find that:

significant, quantifiable savings are substantially likely to result from the buydowns and other appropriate modification of purchase power arrangements and the amount of such savings;

such savings will be passed on to electric ratepayers pursuant to subsection (m) of this section;

facilities whose power purchase arrangements are the subject of the buydowns or other appropriate modifications will be reasonably assured to continue to operate for the life of their power purchase arrangements.

Additional factors. The Commission shall also give consideration to the following factors:

the feasibility of any prospective alternative methods of achieving ratepayer savings;

any impact of the transaction on existing or prospective opportunities for electric consumers to exercise retail choice;

the impact of the transaction on renewable energy resources;

the specific regulatory and accounting treatment that will be required of the purchasing agent, the issuer, the participating qualifying facilities, and the participating electric utilities; and

such other related factors as the Commission deems appropriate.

Collections and remittances. Mitigation charges and the right to receive mitigation charges shall be property of the issuer. The right to receive mitigation charges shall constitute a present interest in property. If requested by the issuer or any successor that is entitled to receive mitigation charges, mitigation charges shall be collected by each participating electric utility for the benefit of the issuer or the issuer’s transferee. Mitigation charges collected by an electric utility shall be remitted by such electric utility to the issuer or its designee within one month after receipt thereof by such electric utility, or such shorter period as shall be designated by the Commission. Upon 30 days’ written notice to an electric utility, the issuer or any successor entitled to receive mitigation charges at any time and for any reason may direct that the electric utility shall cease to collect mitigation charges. Any electric utility in possession of mitigation charges shall have no right, title, or interest in such collections, but rather shall hold such collections in trust for the benefit of the issuer.

Nonbypassable. Mitigation charges shall be separately stated on consumers’ retail electric bills, and shall be payable regardless of any change in structure or identity of the electric utility, and regardless of any change in ownership or operation of any electric generation, transmission, or distribution facilities. If a consumer pays only part of its electric bill for any period, a pro rata portion of the payment may be applied to payment of the mitigation charge for the period.

State pledge. The State of Vermont covenants and pledges for the benefit of the issuer, any assignee of the issuer, and the owners of mitigation bonds that neither the mitigation charge nor the automatic adjustment mechanism set forth in subsection (e) of this section shall be altered, revoked, amended, postponed, impaired, limited, or terminated by the State of Vermont, by the Commission, or by any other agency or instrumentality of the State, absent adequate provision for the protection of the issuer, any designee of the issuer, and the owners of the mitigation bonds. The Commission, as agent of the State of Vermont, is authorized and directed to deliver written confirmation of this covenant and pledge in connection with the issuance of all mitigation bonds.

Bankruptcy. A qualified cost mitigation charge order shall remain in full force and effect, notwithstanding any bankruptcy, reorganization, or other insolvency proceeding with respect to:

any electric utility or successor or assign of any electric utility; or

the Rule 4.100 purchasing agent or any successor or assign of the Rule 4.100 purchasing agent.

Assignment of mitigation charge revenues. The issuer may grant a security interest in, or otherwise assign mitigation charges and the right to receive mitigation charges in connection with, the issuance of mitigation bonds. Such grant or assignment shall be valid and enforceable without delivery or filing.

Hearing procedure. A qualified cost mitigation charge order shall be issued only upon hearing, following due notice to all electric utilities, the owners of all participating qualifying facilities, the Department, and the Rule 4.100 purchasing agent. A qualified cost mitigation charge order issued under this section shall involve all of the State’s electric utilities, absent a showing of good cause by any such utility as to why the requirements and customer benefits resulting from a qualified cost mitigation charge order should not be applicable to it.

Pass-through of savings. A qualified cost mitigation charge order shall contain measures to ensure that savings resulting from that order are passed through to the benefit of electric ratepayers. Such measures may include reduction in utility regulatory assets or creation of regulatory liabilities, adjustments to depreciation or amortization schedules, or the filing of revised tariffs reflecting such savings, which tariffs may be ordered by the Commission without regard to the remaining provisions of this title.

In establishing the appraisal value for the assessment of property taxes on the facilities whose power purchase arrangements are the subject of the buydowns or other appropriate modifications, the municipality may include the amount of any cost mitigation payments made under the authority of this section. For municipalities using an income-based valuation method, the value of any lump sum mitigation payment shall be amortized or prorated over the period of the cost mitigation contract.

Report to Legislature. Upon approval of a cost mitigation order, the Commission shall submit a report to the Legislature containing the order and detailed information on the findings of the Commission, including the risks, savings, and costs likely to result from the buydowns and other appropriate modifications of purchase power arrangements contained in the order.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 209b.
[Reserved for future use.]

§ 209c.
Electricity affordability program.

The Public Utility Commission shall design a proposed electricity affordability program in the form of draft legislation. The program shall be developed with the aid of an electricity affordability program collaborative. The collaborative, composed of representatives from the electric utilities, residential customers, consumer representatives, low-income program representatives, representatives from programs for elders, the Department of Public Service, the Agency of Human Services, and other stakeholders identified by the Commission, shall aid in the development of an electricity affordability program, as well as requirements for the implementation and funding of the program. The proposed electricity affordability program will be presented to the Vermont General Assembly in the form of draft legislation for consideration in January 2007.

The proposed electricity affordability program shall provide assistance in the payment of electricity bills for eligible low-income residential customers served by electric companies subject to the jurisdiction of the Commission.

In developing the electricity affordability program, the Commission shall review the successes and administrative burdens of similar programs in operation in other states and consider the following goals, which shall be afforded equal weight in formulating the program:

the need to provide payment assistance to low-income customers at and below 150 percent of the federal poverty level;

the need for automatic screening and enrollment methods of eligible customers by means of information obtained from existing means-tested financial assistance programs administered by other Vermont agencies such as food stamps, Medicaid, LIHEAP, or TANF; and

the need to design a program that is funded by all customer classes in an equitable and reasonable manner and that results in the reimbursement of net incremental costs incurred by electric utilities to implement the program, taking into consideration the benefits as well as the costs.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 10a; amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 191.

§ 210.
Electric companies; interconnection facilities.

The Public Utility Commission shall have jurisdiction to order electric companies subject to its supervision to build or rebuild electric transmission lines in order to provide adequate interconnection between the transmission systems of the State. The Commission shall have power to exercise the jurisdiction herein conferred only after due notice to all interested parties and opportunity for hearing and after making findings based upon adequate evidence that the ordered construction:

is necessary in the interests of consumers of electrical energy;

is not detrimental to the interests of the investors of the company ordered to build or rebuild;

will serve the public good.

The Commission may allocate the cost of building or rebuilding between the companies whose facilities are to be interconnected, providing that the findings herein referred to are made as to each company affected by such allocation.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1999, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 211.
Electric energy from inside or outside State.

The Department of Public Service is hereby designated as the agent of the State of Vermont with full powers to act for and represent the State in any negotiations, arrangements, or proceedings for the procurement of electric energy from any source outside the State of Vermont or electric energy generated in the State by a producer, cooperative, municipal, or privately owned, which is subject to the supervision of the Department under this chapter with the right, with the approval of the Commission and the Governor, to contract for the purchase of such power and the resale on a nonprofit basis of such power to the electric distribution or transmission companies, cooperative, municipal, and privately owned, without preference or discrimination, for distribution within the State; provided, however, that purchases from sources inside the State of Vermont may be contracted for by the Department of Public Service as agent for the State only upon request of the seller and a determination by the Department that the purchase of such power and its resale on a nonprofit basis to electric distribution or transmission companies, cooperative, municipal, and privately owned, is in furtherance of the needs of the State of Vermont. If the term of any proposed purchase exceeds five years, it shall be subject to the approval of the Commission under section 248 of this title. In addition the Department of Public Service may, with the approval of the Commission and the Governor, contract for the resale of the power outside the State of Vermont, if resale outside the State is reasonably incidental to and in furtherance of the needs of the State of Vermont. Revenues realized by the Department from such resale outside the State shall be used to defray the costs of such resale, and any revenues in excess of such costs, including interest earned on excess revenues, shall be applied first to reduce the Department’s retail rates under section 212a of this title, and thereafter any remaining excess shall be applied to reduce the Department’s wholesale rates to Vermont utilities. The Department of Public Service, with the approval of the Commission, is authorized and empowered to enter into contracts for the transmission of such energy from the place of purchase to the point or points of resale. The Department shall take all reasonable steps to ensure that the contracts it enters into for the transmission, purchase, and wholesale or retail sale of electricity shall be in writing. The Department of Public Service is authorized and empowered to employ additional engineering and legal personnel to assist in the procurement of such energy.

[Repealed.]

An enterprise fund is established in the Department of Public Service to consist of revenues from the resale of power and to support the activities authorized in this section and sections 212 and 212a of this title. Balances shall remain in the fund at the end of each fiscal year, and the fund shall be appropriated and expended in accordance with

32 V.S.A. § 462(b)

. These monies shall not be available to meet the general obligations of the State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1967, No. 196

;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1987, No. 65

, § 2, eff. May 28, 1987;

1987, No. 281

(Adj. Sess.), § 308, eff. June 21, 1988;

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 51, eff. May 14, 2012;

2011, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § E.233.

§ 212.
Niagara power project.

The Department of Public Service, in addition to the powers conferred upon it by section 211 of this title and notwithstanding any limitations on such authority imposed thereby or by any other law of this State, is hereby designated as the agent of the State of Vermont with full power to act for and represent the State in any negotiations, arrangements, or proceedings for the procurement of electrical energy from the Niagara power project authorized by Congress in Public Law 85-159 (16 U.S.C.A. § 836) and for which a license was issued to the power authority of the State of New York by the Federal Power Commission as Project 2216, with the right, with the approval of the Commission, to contract for the purchase of such power and resale thereof in accordance with the terms of said federal legislation with federal license.

HISTORY:

1959, No. 326

(Adj. Sess.), eff. Jan. 29, 1960; amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, eff. Feb. 1, 1981.

§ 212a.
Retail sales by Department; statutory authorization.

The Department of Public Service, in addition to the powers conferred upon it by sections 211 and 212 of this title and notwithstanding any limitations on that authority imposed by those sections or by any other law of this State, is authorized to purchase from any source and to distribute and sell at retail without unjust discrimination, electrical energy directly to all consumers of electricity in Vermont, under the provisions of this section and sections 212b-212f of this title.

The Department may continue to purchase, sell, and distribute electric capacity and energy at retail pursuant to contracts or arrangements that existed under the terms of this section prior to changes effected by

1987, No. 65

. Any purchase, sale, and distribution of electricity by the Department to replace or exceed amounts sold at retail by the Department on May 28, 1987 shall be subject to the provisions of this section and sections 212b-212f as added or amended by

1987, No. 65

.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 20

, eff. April 23, 1985; amended

1987, No. 65

, § 3, eff. May 28, 1987.

§ 212b.
Review Board on Retail Sales.

There is established a board to represent the interests of the State and its residents with respect to retail sales. The Board shall consist of the Governor, the Speaker of the House, the House Majority Leader, the House Minority Leader, one other member of the House from the party other than that of the Speaker appointed by the Speaker, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Senate Majority Leader, the Senate Minority Leader, and one other Senator from the party other than that of the President Pro Tempore appointed by the Committee on Committees. The Review Board shall seek to obtain information from interested parties, including, if appropriate, a representative of each of the following: consumer-owned utilities, investor-owned utilities, electric consumers of the State, and environmental interest groups.

The Governor shall serve as Chair. The Board shall meet as necessary to discharge its duties under this section, and for attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General Assembly, legislative members of the Board shall be entitled to reimbursement for expenses and per diem compensation under

2 V.S.A. § 406(a)

. Meetings shall be at the call of the Chair, or a majority of the voting members of the Board.

Prior to any filing with the Public Utility Commission under section 212c of this title, the Department shall submit any proposal for retail sales of electric energy or capacity to the Review Board on Retail Sales for its review and approval. The Review Board shall approve a proposal for filing with the Public Utility Commission only if it is satisfied that the potential benefits of the retail sale to the ratepayers of the State outweigh any potential risks to the State’s residents, that the sale does not expose the State to unreasonable financial liability, that the sale does not adversely affect the retail electrical energy distribution system as a whole, and that the sale will promote effective competition. The Board shall conduct its review under such rules and procedures as it deems appropriate. The Department may proceed to file the proposal for retail sales with the Public Utility Commission upon approval by the Review Board and failure of the Board to act within 60 days of submission of the proposal shall be deemed to be approval.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 65

, § 4, eff. May 28, 1987.

§ 212c.
Retail sale by the Department; Commission approval.

The Department shall not enter into a contract or arrangement for retail sales unless approved by the Public Utility Commission under this section. Before the Public Utility Commission approves any retail sale of energy or capacity under this section, it shall conclude that the sale will promote the public good of the State by finding that:

the proposed sale, where appropriate, is reasonably required to meet actual or projected growth in statewide demand, to replace amounts of electricity or capacity sold at retail by the Department on May 28, 1987, or to provide capacity or energy needs arising from a bankruptcy filing by any Vermont electric utility;

the Department’s retail rates are just and reasonable, the sale will not result in unjust discrimination in rates, and the sale will result in economic benefits for the State and its residents;

the sale will not adversely affect system stability and reliability, and the sale will be in compliance with the Electric Energy Plan adopted under section 202 of this title, or that there exists good cause to permit the proposed sale; and

the sale is in the best interests of the ratepayers, and that the current and future benefits of the sale outweigh the current and future costs to the State’s residents.

The Commission shall make its final determination under this subsection within six months after a filing by the Department. The Department’s rate filings and any adjustments or exceptions thereto shall be consistent with the procedures set forth in sections 225, 226, 227, 228, and 229 of this title, where applicable.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 65

, § 4, eff. May 28, 1987.

§ 212d.
Access; negotiations; Commission order.

Upon a finding by the Commission that the retail sale will promote the general good of the State under section 212c of this title, Vermont electric utility companies shall enter into negotiations for contracts with the Department that are necessary for sale and distribution, including lease of facilities, provision of services to the Department to distribute electric energy, and the assurance of adequate reliability. The rates, charges, terms, or other conditions of such contracts shall be established by negotiations or pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. No electric utility company with which the Department shares a service territory may unreasonably deny replacement power needed by the Department to assure adequate reliability of service.

If, pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the Department and a company are unable to negotiate the rates, charges, terms, or other conditions of such contracts including the assurance of adequate reliability, either may petition the Public Utility Commission to establish the rates, terms, charges, or conditions thereunder, or resolve any other related matter, as the Commission determines to be just and reasonable. The Commission shall establish rates or charges under this section to compensate or reimburse such company for all costs reasonably and necessarily incurred by it to provide such arrangements. The Commission shall offer an opportunity for commencing a hearing within 45 days of filing of the petition and shall make either a final decision or, if unable to do so, an interim decision within three months of filing of the petition. If, within three months of filing, the Commission is unable to reach a final decision on the petition, the Commission shall direct the company to provide to the Department the necessary arrangements, including if necessary or appropriate, backup reliability, and access to facilities to allow the Department to distribute the electric energy involved in its proposal on an interim basis under such interim terms and conditions as the Commission finds to be reasonable pending a final Commission decision on the petition. The Commission shall render a final decision on the petition within six months from the date it is filed.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 65

, § 4, eff. May 28, 1987; amended

1999, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 212e.
Representation of public; production of records.

The Commission shall request the appearance of the Attorney General or shall appoint a member of the Vermont bar to represent the interests of the public or the State in any hearings before the Commission under section 212a, 212c, or 212d of this title regarding either:

the sale of electrical energy by the Department of Public Service; or

any other matter in which, upon petition of a company directly affected, the Commission finds that there is a conflict or a likelihood of a conflict between the Department’s role as seller or distributor of electrical energy under this section and the Department’s responsibility to represent the interests of the public or the State in that matter. The Department shall upon request provide sufficient funds to the Attorney General or person so appointed to engage necessary engineering or other technical advice.

Any request by the Department of Public Service, or subpoena issued by the Department of Public Service for the production and examination of books, records, and witnesses, or to furnish information under this title, may, upon motion to the Commission by the company affected, be quashed upon a finding by the Commission that the request or subpoena would result in the production of a trade secret or other confidential research, development, or commercial information of the company which would materially disadvantage the company as a competitor to the Department in the sale or distribution of electrical energy.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 65

, § 4, eff. May 28, 1987.

§ 212f.
Identification of Department sales on bills.

Each electric company, municipal, cooperative, or private, shall print on all bill statements to customers at least the following information:

the number of kilowatt hours of electricity available to the customer from the Department of Public Service per billing cycle;

the number of kilowatt hours of Department electricity sold to the customer during the billing cycle; and

the price to the customer of the Department’s electricity per kilowatt hour.

With respect to the information itemized in subsection (a) of this section, the companies are required to identify clearly the Department of Public Service as the retail source of the electricity.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 65

, § 5.

§ 213.
Interchange of electric facilities; power shortage.

The Public Utility Commission, in the interest of public necessity, is hereby empowered to order, in writing, a company engaged in the manufacture, transmission, distribution, or sale of electricity directly to the public or to be used ultimately by the public for lighting, heating, or power, to transport electric energy over its transmission or distribution facilities at a reasonable service charge and in such manner as the Commission shall direct when such transmission will alleviate an electric power shortage within this State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 180

, § 1;

1967, No. 185

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967.

§ 214.
Application for interconnection; joint use of facilities; and resolution of transmission disputes.

The Public Utility Commission, upon application of any electric company, municipal, cooperative, or privately owned, engaged or authorized to engage in the manufacture, transmission, distribution, or sale of electric energy, may by order direct an electric company, municipal, cooperative, or privately owned, engaged in the manufacture, transmission, distribution, or sale of electric energy, to establish physical connection of its transmission or distribution facilities with the facilities of one or more other such electric company or companies, to sell energy to, to exchange energy with, to transmit or distribute energy for any other such electric company or companies. In addition, the Commission, upon application of the Department of Public Service, may by order direct an electric company engaged in the transmission of electric energy to transmit energy for the Department. For the purposes of this section, a company “authorized to engage” means a municipal company authorized under chapter 79 of this title, a cooperative authorized under chapter 81 of this title, or a privately owned company authorized by its articles of association, charter, or bylaws. However, the Commission shall have no authority to compel any electric company to sell or exchange, transmit, or distribute energy when to do so would impair its ability to render adequate service to its customers. The Commission’s order may only be issued after due notice to all interested parties and findings based upon adequate evidence that the Commission’s action will be consistent with the general good of the State and that it is not detrimental to the interest of investors or consumers. The Commission may prescribe the terms and conditions of the arrangement to be made between the electric companies, including the Department of Public Service, affected by the order, including the compensation or reimbursement reasonably due to any of them, and in the case of a new physical connection the apportionment of costs between or among them, provided that a company making application for a connection which will inure to its sole benefit shall assume the entire cost of the connection.

The Commission shall have authority to arbitrate disputes between or among users or prospective users of transmission facilities located within the State, where such disputes arise under any agreement or under any State or federal tariff relating to the provision of or entitlements to transmission services and providing for arbitration by the Commission. In conducting such arbitration, the Commission shall apply the terms and conditions set forth in the agreement or tariff; provided that where a user or prospective user proposes a change in the provision of entitlements to transmission services, it shall bear the burden of proving that the proposed change, including any reduction in or adverse effect upon the transmission services of or entitlements held by any other user, promotes the general good of the State.

In any arbitration proceeding conducted pursuant to this section, the Commission shall give notice to all Vermont electric companies, the Department, and any other persons or entities that have notified the Commission that they hold entitlements to the transmission services that will be the subject of the proceeding. Upon proper application, all persons and entities entitled to notice under this subsection shall be permitted to participate in the proceeding.

The provisions of

12 V.S.A. §§ 5671(6)

-(9) and 5676-5679 shall not apply to any arbitration proceeding conducted pursuant to the provisions of this section if the agreement or tariff under which arbitration is being conducted provides for direct appeal of questions of law to the Supreme Court. In such cases, any award, order, or decree of the Commission shall, solely for purposes of proceedings subsequent to the issuance of the same, be treated as if it were an order of the Commission acting in a quasi-judicial capacity in a contested case, except that the Commission shall have no power of enforcement. The provisions of sections 12, 14, and 15 of this title shall also apply in such cases.

Notwithstanding

12 V.S.A. § 5652(b)

, a provision to arbitrate transmission disputes is enforceable if contained in a validly filed state or federal tariff. Unless otherwise provided, a provision to arbitrate contained in a validly filed tariff creates a duty to arbitrate and is valid and enforceable, except upon such grounds as exist for the termination or revocation of the tariff.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 185

, § 22, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1981, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 13, 1982;

1987, No. 65

, § 6, eff. May 28, 1987;

1987, No. 237

(Adj. Sess.), eff. May 24, 1988.

§ 215.
Natural gas.

The Department of Public Service, or its duly appointed representative, is hereby authorized as an agency of the State to represent the interests of the State before the Federal Power Commission or other body in all matters relating to the transportation and distribution of natural gas into the State of Vermont or the New England states.
Upon findings by the natural gas study commission that (a) the procurement of natural gas for the State of Vermont or parts thereof is economically feasible and could substantially promote the interests of Vermont consumers, domestic and industrial, and (b) that such procurement cannot be obtained by agreement between or among gas transmission or distribution companies within and outside the State, within a reasonable time, not to exceed two years, the Department of Public Service shall be also designated as the agent of the State of Vermont with full powers to act for and represent the State in any negotiations, arrangements, or proceedings for the procurement of natural gas from any source within or outside of the State of Vermont with the right, with the approval of the Governor, to contract for the purchase and transmission of such gas and the resale thereof on a nonprofit basis to the gas transmission or distribution companies, cooperative, municipal, and privately owned, without preference or discrimination, for transmission or distribution within the State.
With the approval of the Governor, it may enter into contracts for the transmission of natural gas from the place of purchase to a point or points within the State of Vermont.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 267

, § 2, eff. Aug. 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 35, eff. Feb. 1, 1981.

§ 216.
Gas rate fixing.

The Public Utility Commission, under its general jurisdiction over public utilities, shall have authority to fix rates and determine the minimum standards of service for consumers in the event natural gas shall be piped into the State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 217.
Department to prosecute.

The Department of Public Service, through the Director for Public Advocacy, shall represent the public at such hearing when the matters involved result directly from a proposed increase in rates, tolls, or charges, or the issuing of stock, bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness for which the approval of the Commission is required by law.
In any proceeding, the Commission may request the appearance of the Attorney General or appoint a member of the Vermont bar to represent the interests of the public or State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. Feb. 1, 1981.